Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2009
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2009 to 44-2013 shall be known and may be cited as the Unauthorized Insurers Process Act.

Laws 1949, c. 134, § 7, p. 353;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-137.10;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 27.